Arkansas, session 2025, SB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-403(d)(3), concerning designated
bearers, authorized agents, and administrators, is amended to read as
follows:
(3)(A) At least one (1) long-term care or residential care
facility staff member shall witness the administrator assist the voter by
marking a ballot on behalf of the voter without any comment or
interpretation.
(B) An administrator may deliver the absentee ballot to
the county clerk for any voter who names the administrator on his or her
application and voter statement.
(B)(C) Absentee ballots may be delivered to the county
clerk in person by the administrator or by mail.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-403(d)(4)(E), concerning designated
*SSS117*
03-10-2025 13:49:49 SSS117

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB299
bearers, authorized agents, and administrators for residents of a long-term
care facility, is amended to read as follows:
(E) That the administrator understands that Arkansas law
requires that at least one (1) long-term care or residential care facility
staff member is required to witness the administrator assist the voter by
marking or casting a ballot on behalf of the voter without any comment or
interpretation.

/s/K. Hammer



























03-10-2025 13:49:49 SSS117